Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-242
Town officers; oath; certificate; filing.

Every person elected or appointed to the office of town clerk, town treasurer, or town chairman, before he enters upon the duties of his office, and within ten days after he shall be notified of his election or appointment, shall take and subscribe before some authorized person an oath or affirmation to faithfully and impartially perform the duties of his office, as prescribed by law, and shall cause a certificate of the same to be filed in the office of the town clerk.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 40, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 1026;

C.S.1922, § 928;

C.S.1929, § 26-242;

R.S.1943, § 23-242;

Laws 1957, c. 62, § 3, p. 281;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 9.

Statute is applicable to road overseer and neglect of road overseer to comply herewith may be deemed refusal by him to serve in that capacity. State ex rel. Luckey v. Weber, 124 Neb. 84, 245 N.W. 407 (1932).